Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 9

Dissolution, Liquidation and Merger

45-4-901. Dissolution.

A majority of the entire membership of any credit union may vote to dissolve the credit union at a regular or special meeting called for that expressly stated purpose.

Any member, within twenty (20) days of the date of the mailing of notice of the meeting, may vote on the question of dissolution by signing a statement in a form approved by the commissioner, and the vote shall have the same force and effect as any other vote.

The credit union shall, upon a vote for dissolution, immediately cease to do all business except for the purpose of liquidation, and the president and secretary shall, within fifteen (15) days following the meeting, notify the commissioner in writing of its intention to liquidate, and shall include in the notice a list of the names of directors and officers of the credit union together with their addresses.

Acts 1923, ch. 68, § 23; Shan. Supp., § 2198a30; Code 1932, § 3857; Acts 1973, ch. 294, § 6; 1974, ch. 557, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1828; Acts 1986, ch. 558, § 5.

45-4-902. Liquidation.

A credit union under order to liquidate or in the course of dissolution or liquidation shall continue in existence for the purpose of discharging its debts, collecting and distributing its assets, and doing all acts required in order to wind up its business, and may sue and be sued for the purpose of enforcing the debts and obligations until its affairs are fully adjusted. The board of directors of the credit union, or, in the case of involuntary dissolution or liquidation by order of the commissioner, the liquidating agent, shall use the assets of the credit union to pay:

All expenses incidental to liquidation, including, but not limited to, any surety bond that may be required;

Any liability due nonmembers; and

Redemption of shares, share accounts, and members' special accounts.

Assets then remaining shall be distributed to the members proportionately to the purchase price of shares held by each member as of the date dissolution was voted, or the date of order of liquidation or suspension by the commissioner, as the case may be.

As soon as the board or the liquidating agent determines that all assets from which there is a reasonable expectancy of realization have been liquidated and distributed as set forth in this section, it shall execute a certificate of dissolution and forward the same to the commissioner, who shall review the details of the liquidation and, if approving it, shall issue a certificate of approval and return the certificate to the board or liquidating agent, who shall then file it with the secretary of state and thereafter with the office of the register of deeds of the county in which the credit union has its principal place of business.

If a credit union has filed a certificate of dissolution or has indicated an intention to file the certificate, and the directors and officers of the credit union, in the opinion of the commissioner, are not conducting the liquidation proceedings in an expeditious, orderly, and efficient manner or in the best interests of its members, the commissioner may terminate the liquidation proceedings, take possession of the business and property of the credit union, and, for the purpose of carrying out the liquidation, may appoint, or cause to be appointed, a liquidating agent. The liquidating agent shall furnish bond for the faithful discharge of duties in an amount to be approved by the commissioner.

The liquidating agent may, under rules and regulations that the supervisor prescribes:

Receive and take possession of the books, records, assets, and property of every description of the credit union in liquidation; sell, enforce collection of, and liquidate the assets and property; compound all bad or doubtful debts; sue in the name of the credit union in liquidation; and defend actions brought against the liquidating agent in that capacity or against the credit union;

Receive, examine, and pass upon all claims against the credit union in liquidation, including claims of members;

Make distribution and payment to creditors and members as their interests appear;

Execute documents and papers and do other acts that the liquidating agent deems necessary or desirable to discharge duties; and

The expenses incurred by the liquidating agent in the liquidation of the credit union include the compensation of the liquidating agent and any other necessary or proper expenses connected therewith, all of which shall be paid in order of priority out of the property of the credit union in the hands of the liquidating agent. The expenses of liquidation, including the compensation of the liquidating agent, are subject to approval by the commissioner unless the agent is appointed by the court.

Acts 1923, ch. 68, § 23; Shan. Supp., § 2198a30; Code 1932, § 3857; Acts 1973, ch. 294, § 6; 1974, ch. 557, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1828; Acts 1986, ch. 558, § 5.

Cross-References. Shares of liquidating credit unions in volunteer corporate credit unions, §45-4-1208.

45-4-903. Merger.

Any credit union may, with the approval of the commissioner of financial institutions, merge with any other credit union under the existing charter of the other credit union, pursuant to any plan approved by the board of directors of each credit union joining in the merger, and approved by two-thirds (2/3) of the members of each credit union represented at a meeting of members duly called for that purpose, at which a minimum of ten percent (10%) of the entire membership is present, unless the meeting of members of either credit union has been waived by the commissioner. After approval of the board and members of each credit union, the president or chair of the board and secretary of each credit union shall execute a certificate of merger, which shall set forth all of the following:

The time and place of the meeting of the board of directors at which the plan was agreed upon;

The vote in favor of adoption of the plan;

A copy of the resolution or other action by which the plan was agreed upon;

The time and place of the meeting of the members at which the plan agreed upon was approved; and

The vote by which the plan was approved by the members.

The certificates and a copy of the plan of merger agreed upon shall be forwarded to the commissioner and, upon approval, returned to the merging credit unions. The certificate of merger, with the certificate of approval of the commissioner annexed it, shall be recorded in the office of the secretary of state and in the register's office of the county in which each credit union has its principal place of business.

Upon a merger so effected, all property, property rights, and interests of the merged credit unions shall vest in the surviving credit union without deed, endorsement, or other instrument of transfer, and all debts, obligations, and liabilities of the merged credit unions shall be deemed to have been assumed by the surviving credit union under whose charter the merger was effected.

This section shall be construed, whenever possible, to permit a credit union chartered under any other act to merge with one chartered under this chapter.

All members of both credit unions effecting a merger shall be deemed to have a common bond of association, occupation or residence as required by § 45-4-101, for formation of credit unions generally.

A merger fee of three hundred dollars ($300) shall be paid to the commissioner to cover the salary and expenses of department personnel assigned to supervise the merger. The fee shall be paid by the surviving credit union if it is chartered under the laws of Tennessee. Otherwise the fee shall be paid by the merging credit union.

Acts 1923, ch. 68, § 23; Shan. Supp., § 2198a30; Code 1932, § 3857; Acts 1973, ch. 294, § 6; 1974, ch. 557, § 3; 1979, ch. 86, § 9; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1828; Acts 1984, ch. 714, § 1.